apertium-wbp.wbp.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for wbp

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>   ! Noun
%<adj%>   ! Adjective
%<v%>   ! Verb
%<prevb%>   ! Preverb
%<mod%>   ! Clitic/Particle
%<vaux%>   ! Auxiliary
%<cnjcoo%> ! Coordinating Conjunction
%<prn%>   ! Pronomial
%<num%>   ! Numeral
%<adv%>   ! Adverb

! Number morphology
%<sg%>  ! Singular
%<du%>  ! Dual
%<pl%>  ! Plural

! Person morphology
%<p1%>  ! First Person
%<p2%>  ! Second Person
%<p3%>  ! Third Person

! Person morphology
%<p1%>  ! First Person
%<p2%>  ! Second Person
%<p3%>  ! Third Person

! Inclusivity morphology
%<incl%>  ! Inclusive
%<excl%>  ! Exclusive

! Subject morphology
%<subj1sg%>  ! 1st Person Singular Subject
%<subj2sg%>  ! 2nd Person Singular Subject
%<subj3sg%>  ! 3rd Person Singular Subject
%<subj1duincl%>  ! 1st Person Dual Inclusive Subject
%<subj1duexcl%>  ! 1st Person Dual Exclusive Subject
%<subj1plincl%>  ! 1st Person Plural Inclusive Subject
%<subj1plexcl%>  ! 1st Person Plural Exclusive Subject
%<subj2du%>  ! 2nd Person Dual Subject
%<subj2pl%>  ! 2nd Person Plural Subject
%<subj3du%>  ! 3rd Person Dual Subject
%<subj3pl%>  ! 3rd Person Plural Subject

! Object morphology
%<obj1sg%>  ! 1st Person Singular Object
%<obj2sg%>  ! 2nd Person Singular Object
%<obj3sg%>  ! 3rd Person Singular Object
%<obj1duincl%>  ! 1st Person Dual Inclusive Object
%<obj1duexcl%>  ! 1st Person Dual Exclusive object
%<obj1plincl%>  ! 1st Person Plural Inclusive Object
%<obj1plexcl%>  ! 1st Person Plural Exclusive Object
%<obj2du%>  ! 2nd Person Dual Object
%<obj2pl%>  ! 2nd Person Plural Object
%<obj3du%>  ! 3rd Person Dual Object
%<obj3pl%>  ! 3rd Person Plural Object

! Cases
%<abs%>  ! Absolutive
%<dat%>  ! Dative
%<erg%>  ! Ergative
%<all%>  ! Allative
%<com%>  ! Comitative
%<ela%>  ! Elative
%<loc%>  ! Locative
%<assoc%>  ! Associative
%<excess%>  ! Excessive
%<deniz%>  ! Denizen
%<inhab%>  ! Inhabitant
%<sim%>  ! Similative
%<poss%>  ! Possessive
%<priv%>  ! Privative
%<prop%>  ! Proprietive
%<src%>  ! Source

! Verb Transitivity
%<tv%>  ! Transitive
%<iv%>  ! Intransitive

! Verb Tenses
%<pres%>  ! Present
%<fti%>  ! Future
%<past%>  ! Past
%<imp%>  ! Imperative
%<inc%> ! Inceptive

! Auxiliaries Tenses
%<pres%>  ! Present
%<pii%>  ! Imperfect
%<prf%>  ! Perfect
%<caus%>  ! Causal
%<rel%>  ! Relative
%<cni%>  ! Conditional
%<usi%>  ! Usitative
%<neg%>  ! Negative
%<adm%>  ! Admonitive

! Verb Directions
%<twrds%>  ! Towards
%<away%>  ! Away
%<across%>  ! Across

%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side) 
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side) 
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side) 
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side) 


! Other symbols
%<subst%> ! Substantive (makes adjective into noun)
%<pers%> ! Personal Pronoun
%<refl%> ! Reflexive
%<top%>  ! Topicalizing particle
%>       ! Morpheme boundary
%{I%}    ! can be i or u
%{D%}    ! can be - or null
%{U%}	 ! can be i or u
%-


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

NounRoot ;
VerbRoot ;
AuxRoot ;
PronomRoot ;
ConjRoot ;
AdjRoot ;
NumRoot ;
AdvRoot ; 
Punctuation ;



! LEXICON RegNounInfl
! %<n%>%<sg%>: # ;
! %<n%>%<pl%>:%>s # ;


LEXICON VerbClassI_iv
%<v%>%<iv%>: VerbClassI_Suffixes ;

LEXICON VerbClassI_tv
%<v%>%<tv%>: VerbClassI_Suffixes ;

LEXICON VerbClassI_Suffixes
%<pres%>: VerbDirection ; ! Dir/LR
%<pres%>:%-mi VerbDirection ;
%<pres%>:mi VerbDirection ; ! Dir/LR
%<fti%>:%-ji VerbDirection ;
%<fti%>:ji VerbDirection ; ! Dir/LR
%<past%>:%-ja VerbDirection ;
%<past%>:ja VerbDirection ; ! Dir/LR
%<imp%>:%-ya VerbDirection ;
%<imp%>:ya VerbDirection ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON VerbClassII_tv
%<v%>%<tv%>: VerbClassII_Suffixes ;

LEXICON VerbClassII_Suffixes
%<pres%>:%-rni VerbDirection ; 
%<pres%>:rni VerbDirection ; ! Dir/LR
%<fti%>:%>ku VerbDirection ;
%<past%>:%>-rnu VerbDirection ; ! Dir/LR
%<past%>:%>rnu VerbDirection ;
%<past%>%<inc%>:%>rnunjunu VerbDirection ;
%<imp%>:%>ka VerbDirection ;

LEXICON VerbClassIII_iv
%<v%>%<iv%>: VerbClassIII_Suffixes ;

LEXICON VerbClassIII_tv
%<v%>%<tv%>: VerbClassIII_Suffixes ;

LEXICON VerbClassIII_Suffixes
%<pres%>:%-nyi VerbDirection ;
%<pres%>:nyi VerbDirection ; ! Dir/LR
%<fti%>:%>ngku VerbDirection ;
%<past%>:%-ngu VerbDirection ;
%<past%>:ngu VerbDirection ; ! Dir/LR
%<imp%>:%>ngka VerbDirection;


LEXICON VerbClassIV_tv
%<v%>%<tv%>: VerbClassIV_Suffixes ;

LEXICON VerbClassIV_Suffixes
%<pres%>:%>rni VerbDirection ;
%<fti%>:%>lku VerbDirection ;
%<past%>:%>rnu VerbDirection ;
%<past%>%<inc%>:%>rnunjunu VerbDirection ;
%<imp%>:%>nja VerbDirection ;

LEXICON VerbClassV_iv
%<v%>%<iv%>: VerbClassV_Suffixes ;

LEXICON VerbClassV_tv
%<v%>%<tv%>: VerbClassV_Suffixes ;

LEXICON VerbClassV_Suffixes
%<pres%>:%>ni VerbDirection ;
%<fti%>:%>nku VerbDirection ;
%<past%>:%>nu VerbDirection ;
%<past%>%<inc%>:%>nunjunu VerbDirection ;
%<imp%>:%>nta VerbDirection ;

LEXICON VerbDirection
%<twrds%>:%>rni # ;
%<away%>:%>rra # ;
%<across%>:%>mpa # ;
VerbTense ;
!# ;

LEXICON TenseAux
ka%<vaux%>%<pres%>:ka Dash_SubjectAux ;
ka%<vaux%>%<fti%>:kapu Dash_SubjectAux ;
ka%<vaux%>%<fti%>:kapi Dash_SubjectAux ;! Dir/LR 
ka%<vaux%>%<pii%>:lpa Dash_SubjectAux ;
ka%<vaux%>%<caus%>:yunga Dash_SubjectAux ;
ka%<vaux%>%<caus%>:yinga Dash_SubjectAux ;! Dir/LR 
ka%<vaux%>%<caus%>:yungu Dash_SubjectAux ;! Dir/LR 
ka%<vaux%>%<rel%>:kuja Dash_SubjectAux ;
ka%<vaux%>%<cni%>:kajilpa Dash_SubjectAux ;
ka%<vaux%>%<usi%>:kala Dash_SubjectAux ;
ka%<vaux%>%<neg%>:kulaka Dash_SubjectAux ;
ka%<vaux%>%<adm%>:kalaka Dash_SubjectAux ;
!ka%<vaux%>%<prf%>:SubjectAux ;
ka%<vaux%>%<src%>:kajangka Dash_SubjectAux ;
ka%<vaux%>%<rel%>:ngula Dash_SubjectAux ;! Dir/LR 
PerfectAux ;

LEXICON PerfectAux
ka%<vaux%>%<prf%>: SubjectAux ;
ka%<vaux%>%<prf%>%<subj1sg%>:rna SubjectObjectAux;
ka%<vaux%>%<prf%>%<subj2sg%>:n SubjectObjectAux;
ka%<vaux%>%<prf%>%<subj2sg%>:npa SubjectObjectAux;
!ka%<vaux%>%<prf%>%<subj3sg%>%<obj3sg%>: SubjectObjectAux ;
ka%<vaux%>%<prf%>%<subj1duincl%>:rli SubjectObjectAux;
ka%<vaux%>%<prf%>%<subj1duexcl%>:rlijarra SubjectObjectAux;
ka%<vaux%>%<prf%>%<subj1plincl%>:rlipa SubjectObjectAux;
ka%<vaux%>%<prf%>%<subj1plexcl%>:rna-lu SubjectObjectAux;
ka%<vaux%>%<prf%>%<subj2du%>:n-pala SubjectObjectAux;
ka%<vaux%>%<prf%>%<subj2du%>:npa-pala SubjectObjectAux;
ka%<vaux%>%<prf%>%<subj2pl%>:nku-lu SubjectObjectAux;
ka%<vaux%>%<prf%>%<subj3du%>:pala SubjectObjectAux;
ka%<vaux%>%<prf%>%<subj3pl%>:lu SubjectObjectAux;

LEXICON VerbTense
%<pii%>:-lpa Dash_Verb_ObjectAux ;
%<pii%>:lpa Dash_Verb_ObjectAux ; ! Dir/LR 
Dash_Verb_ObjectAux ;

LEXICON Dash_Verb_ObjectAux
# ;
:%>%- ObjectAux ;
:%> ObjectAux ;

LEXICON NounTense
%<prf%>: Dash_SubjectAux ;
%<pii%>:%-lpa Dash_SubjectAux ;
%<pii%>:lpa Dash_SubjectAux ;! Dir/LR 

!LEXICON Conditional
!%<vaux%>%<cni%>: %>ji # ;
!%<vaux%>%<fti%>: %>pi # ;
!%<vaux%>%<pres%>: # ;


LEXICON Dash_SubjectAux
!# ; 
:%>%- SubjectAux ;  
: SubjectAux ; ! Dir/LR 
:%>%- ObjectAux ;  
: ObjectAux ; ! Dir/LR 
%<subj3sg%>: SubjectObjectAux ;


LEXICON SubjectAux
%<subj1sg%>:rna SubjectObjectAux;
%<subj2sg%>:n SubjectObjectAux;
%<subj2sg%>:npa SubjectObjectAux;
!%<subj3sg%>%<obj3sg%>: SubjectObjectAux ;
%<subj1duincl%>:rli SubjectObjectAux;
%<subj1duexcl%>:rlijarra SubjectObjectAux;
%<subj1plincl%>:rlipa SubjectObjectAux;
%<subj1plexcl%>:rna-lu SubjectObjectAux;
%<subj1plexcl%>:rnalu SubjectObjectAux; ! Dir/LR
%<subj2du%>:n-pala SubjectObjectAux;
%<subj2du%>:npa-pala SubjectObjectAux;
%<subj2pl%>:nku-lu SubjectObjectAux;
%<subj2pl%>:nkulu SubjectObjectAux; ! Dir/LR
%<subj3du%>:pala SubjectObjectAux;
%<subj3pl%>:lu SubjectObjectAux;

LEXICON SubjectObjectAux
# ;
:%>%- ObjectAux ;
: ObjectAux ;

LEXICON VerbRoot
parnkami:parnka VerbClassI_iv ; ! to run
karrimi:karri VerbClassI_iv ; ! to be standing
purlami:purla VerbClassI_iv ; ! to shout
jangkardu-parnkami:jangkardu-parnka VerbClassI_tv ; ! to attack
nyinami:nyina VerbClassI_iv ; ! to be
jarda-jarrimi:jarda-jarri VerbClassI_iv ; ! to sleep
julyurl-wantimi:julyurl-wanti VerbClassI_iv ; ! to swim
pardimi:pardi VerbClassI_iv ; ! to emerge, grow
wipimi:wipi VerbClassI_iv ; ! to extend
pata-karrimi:pata-karri VerbClassI_iv ; ! to fall
nyinanja-wantimi:nyinanja-wanti VerbClassI_iv ; ! to sit down 
paarr-paarr-jankami:paarr-paarr-janka VerbClassI_tv ; ! to burn or hurt
yukami:yuka VerbClassI_iv ; ! to enter
yarnkami:yarnka VerbClassI_iv ; ! to depart
japirdimi:japirdi VerbClassI_iv ; ! to threaten (NEED TV)
jarntimi:jarnti VerbClassI_iv ; ! to limp
jirrtimi:jirrti VerbClassI_iv ; ! to hang out (tongue)
kampami:kampa VerbClassI_iv ; ! to burn
karlimi:karli VerbClassI_iv ; ! to flow
kawarirrimi:kawarirri VerbClassI_iv ; ! to wander
irrimi:irri VerbClassI_iv ; ! to swell
ngunami:nguna VerbClassI_iv ; ! to lie, recline
palimi:pali VerbClassI_iv ; ! to die
papimi:papi VerbClassI_iv ; ! to ignite 
parntimi:parnti VerbClassI_iv ; ! to smell, give off odour
purrami:purra VerbClassI_iv ; ! to burn, cook something (NEED TV)
wapami:wapa VerbClassI_iv ; ! to move about, go
waraparnpimi:waraparnpi VerbClassI_iv ; ! to sing out
wirnpirlimi:wirnpirli VerbClassI_iv ; ! to whistle
yampimi:yampi VerbClassI_iv ; ! to leave someone alone (NEED TV)
yulami:yula VerbClassI_iv ; ! to cry, howl
yurirrimi:yurirri VerbClassI_iv ; ! to move, stir
yirrarni:yirra VerbClassII_tv ; ! to put, make
yunparni:yunpa VerbClassII_tv ; ! to sing
payirni:payi VerbClassII_tv ; ! to interrogate
milarni:mila VerbClassII_tv ; ! to choose
yarlkirni:yarlki VerbClassII_tv ; ! to sting/bite
warla-mardarni:warla-marda VerbClassII_tv ; ! to protect
witirni:witi VerbClassII_tv ; ! to have
mardarni:marda VerbClassII_tv ; ! to own
marnpirni:marnpi VerbClassII_tv ; ! to touch
parnpirni:parnpi VerbClassII_tv ; ! to injure
pantirni:pant%{I%} VerbClassII_tv ; ! to spear/draw
yajarni:yaja VerbClassII_tv ; ! to fetch or make (plants) grow
kijirni:kiji VerbClassII_tv ; ! to throw
jarntirni:jarnti VerbClassII_tv ; ! to carve
pajirni:paji VerbClassII_tv ; ! to bite or pick/gather
yangkarni:yangka VerbClassII_tv ; ! to wear (something)
pardarni:parda VerbClassII_tv ; ! to wait (for)
katirni:kati VerbClassII_tv ; ! to tread on
jajarni:jaja VerbClassII_tv ; ! to feed from
japirni:japi VerbClassII_tv ; ! to ask (someone) about something
kardirni:kardi VerbClassII_tv ; ! to scoop up
kipirni:kipi VerbClassII_tv ; ! to winnow
larrjirni:larrji VerbClassII_tv ; ! to scratch
maparni:mapa VerbClassII_tv ; ! to rub, anoint
mirrirni:mirri VerbClassII_tv ; ! to erase
ngantirni:nganti VerbClassII_tv ; ! to build, erect
ngarrirni:ngarri VerbClassII_tv ; ! to tell/scold
nyunjirni:nyunji VerbClassII_tv ; ! to kiss
yinyi:y%{I%} VerbClassIII_tv ; ! to give
wajili-pinyi:wajili-p%{I%} VerbClassIII_tv ; ! to chase
jangku-pinyi:jangku-p%{I%} VerbClassIII_tv ; ! to promise
juurl-pinyi:juurl-p%{I%} VerbClassIII_iv ; ! to jump
muru-pinyi:muru-p%{I%} VerbClassIII_tv ; ! to insert or swallow
nyanyi:nya VerbClassIII_tv ; ! to look for/seek
purda-nyanyi:purda-nya VerbClassIII_tv ; ! to hear
marri-pinyi:marri-p%{I%} VerbClassIII_tv ; ! to desire
pinyi:p%{I%} VerbClassIII_tv ; ! to hit, bit, dance
milya-pinyi:milya-p%{I%} VerbClassIII_tv ; ! to recognize
lurlurl-pi-nyi:lurlurl-p%{I%} VerbClassIII_tv ; ! to shake
wangul-pi-nyi:wangul-p%{I%} VerbClassIII_tv ; ! to winnow
ngarni:nga VerbClassIV_tv ; ! to eat
yani:ya VerbClassV_iv ; ! to come, go
mirlirliny-mani:mirlirliny-ma VerbClassV_iv ; ! to shine
larra-yani:larra-ya VerbClassV_iv ; ! to crack
mani:ma VerbClassV_tv ; ! to get, pick up, do
wiriji-mani:wiriji-ma VerbClassV_tv ; ! to save
jungarni-mani:jungarni-ma VerbClassV_tv ; ! to explain
yalyi-mani:yalyi-ma VerbClassV_tv ; ! to undress
pipa-kurra-mani:pipa-kurra-ma VerbClassV_tv ; ! to write
kirlka-ma-ni:kirlka-ma VerbClassV_tv ; ! to clean
